Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2204.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 306(a.3)(1) and 314(b) of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, are amended to read:Section 306. The following schedule of compensation is hereby established:* * *(a.3) (1) When an employe has received total disability compensation pursuant to clause (a) for a period of one hundred and four weeks, unless otherwise agreed to, the employe shall be required to submit to a medical examination which shall be requested by the insurer within sixty days upon the expiration 123456789101112131415161718192021 of the one hundred and four weeks to determine the degree of impairment due to the compensable injury, if any. The degree of impairment shall be determined based upon an evaluation by a physician who is licensed in this Commonwealth[,] and who is certified by an American Board of Medical Specialties-approved board or its osteopathic equivalent [and who is active in clinical practice for at least twenty hours per week], chosen by agreement of the parties, or as designated by the department, pursuant to the American Medical Association "Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment," 6th edition (second printing April 2009).* * *Section 314. * * *(b) In the case of a physical examination, the employe shall be entitled to have a health care provider of his own selection, to be paid by him, participate in such examination requested by his employer or ordered by the workers' compensation judge. In instances where an examination is requested in relation to section 306(a.3)(1), such examination shall be performed by a physician who is licensed in this Commonwealth[,] and who is certified by an American Board of Medical Specialties approved board or its osteopathic equivalent [and who is in active clinical practice for at least twenty (20) hours per week].Section 2. The Department of Labor and Industry shall promulgate regulations to implement the amendment of sections 306(a.3)(1) and 314(b) of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2204PN2897 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627